Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Sanitary Regulations Generally

§§ 35-7-401 through 35-7-415.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 173, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 108, §§ 1 through 6, 8 through 10, 19 through 20, and 22 through 25, related to general provisions on sanitary regulations.